Louisiana, session 2026, HB786.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:460.75 (C) through (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 46:460.75(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§460.75. Provider claim payment and information protection
* * *
C.(1) For the purposes of this Section, "extrapolation" means a mathematical
process or technique used by a managed care organization in the audit of a healthcare
provider to estimate audit results or findings for a larger batch or group of claims not
reviewed by the managed care organization.
(2) A managed care organization shall be strictly prohibited from using
extrapolation to complete an audit of a healthcare provider. Any additional payment
due to a healthcare provider or any refund or recoupment due to the managed care
organization shall be based on the actual overpayment or underpayment and shall not
be based on extrapolation.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be interpreted or construed to prevent or
otherwise prohibit the department or the Louisiana Department of Justice of using
extrapolation to complete an audit of a healthcare provider pursuant to existing state
and federal law and regulation.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 786 ENROLLED
C. D. The provisions of this Section shall not be waived by contract, and any
contractual clause in conflict with the provisions of this Section or that purports to
waive any requirements of this Section is void.
D. E. If the managed care organization, its contracted vendor, or agent
violates any provision of this Section, the department shall impose penalties on the
managed care organization in accordance with contract provisions or rules and
regulations promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, except that
penalties shall be imposed without the necessity of the department having to issue
any prior notice of corrective action.
E. F. As used in this Section, "electronic funds transfer" means an electronic
funds transfer through the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, standard automated clearinghouse network.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.